New Jersey, session 221, S746.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1998, c.145 (C.18A:71-78.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    A person who is an active member of a volunteer fire company or volunteer first aid or rescue squad or association in good standing and the dependent children and spouse of a volunteer shall be allowed to enroll in a postsecondary program on a tuition-free basis in a county college, county vocational school [or], county technical institute, or four-year public institution of higher education and be eligible to receive tuition credit in an amount not to exceed a maximum of [$2,400] $4,000 for the member, children and spouse; provided that available classroom space permits and that tuition paying students constitute the minimum number required for the course.  Nothing herein shall preclude a county college, county vocational school [or] , county technical institute , or four-year public institution of higher education from requiring registration and lab fees for individuals attending courses pursuant to this act. (cf: P.L.1998, c.145, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1998, c.145 (C.18A:71-78.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    In order to be eligible to receive tuition credit at a county college, county vocational school [or] , county technical institute, or four-year public institution of higher education , a person shall agree to serve as a member of a volunteer fire company or volunteer first aid or rescue squad or association for a minimum of four years and sign an agreement with the municipality in which the squad or association is located pledging four years of service in exchange for the tuition credit.  Following each year of volunteer service performed, the volunteer or the spouse or dependent child shall be entitled to receive tuition credit of up to [$600] $1,000, not to exceed a maximum of [$2,400] $4,000 for the member, children and spouse over a four-year service period. (cf: P.L.1998, c.145, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1998, c.145 (C.18A:71-78.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Upon being accepted and enrolled in a county college, county vocational school [or], county technical institute , or four-year public institution of higher education, the volunteer, dependent child or spouse shall provide verification to the institution that the volunteer has performed the service required for the tuition credit.  Upon completion of each semester, the volunteer shall submit a transcript to the municipality to be maintained in a permanent record.  The volunteer or the dependent child or spouse shall maintain a "C" grade average in order to continue eligibility for the tuition credit program. (cf: P.L.1998, c.145, s.3) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment. STATEMENT Through the Volunteer Tuition Credit Program, an active member of a volunteer fire company or volunteer first aid or rescue squad, and the dependent children and spouse of a volunteer, may enroll in a postsecondary program on a tuition-free basis in a county college, county vocational school, or county technical institute and be eligible to receive tuition credit in an amount not to exceed $600 per year, provided that available classroom space permits and that tuition paying students constitute the minimum number required for the course.  The maximum value of the tuition credit available through the program is currently set at $2,400 over a four-year period of eligibility. This bill expands the program to volunteers, and their dependent children and spouses, who enroll in a four-year public institution of higher education.  This bill also increases the maximum value of the tuition credit available through the program to $1,000 per year, for a maximum total tuition credit of $4,000 over four years of eligibility.